sl-SI: Lokacija namestitve: Sredinsko; Konzola; V armaturni plošči; Leva stran (port); Desna stran (starboard); Površinska pritrditev (univerzalna); Prtljažnik / tovorni prostor; Pod armaturno ploščo; Pod sedežem; Univerzalno / ni specifično za stran; Drugo
fi: Asennuskohta: Keskellä; Konsoli; Kojelautaan upotettava; Paapuuri; Styyrpuuri; Pinta-asennus (yleiskäyttöinen); Tavaratila / rahtitila; Kojelaudan alle asennettava; Istuimen alle asennettava; Yleiskäyttöinen / ei puolisidonnainen; Muu
nb: Monteringsplassering: Senter; Konsoll; Innmontert i dashbord; Babord; Styrbord; Utenpåliggende montering (universell); Bagasjerom / lasteområde; Under dashbord; Under sete; Universell / ikke sidespesifikk; Annet
en: Mounting location: Center; Console; In-dash; Port; Starboard; Surface mount (universal); Trunk / cargo area; Under-dash; Under-seat; Universal/Not side-specific; Other
vi: Vị trí lắp đặt: Ở giữa; Bảng điều khiển; Tích hợp trên bảng táp-lô; Mạn trái; Mạn phải; Gắn nổi (đa năng); Cốp xe / khoang chở hàng; Dưới bảng táp-lô; Dưới gầm ghế; Đa năng/Không phân biệt hai bên; Khác
de: Montageort: Mitte; Konsole; Im Armaturenbrett; Backbord; Steuerbord; Aufbaumontage (universell); Kofferraum / Ladefläche; Unter dem Armaturenbrett; Unter dem Sitz; Universell/Nicht seitenspezifisch; Sonstige
sk-SK: Lokalita montáže: Stred; Konzola; V palubnej doske; Ľavý bok (Port); Pravý bok (Starboard); Povrchová montáž (univerzálna); Kufrový / batožinový priestor; Pod palubnou doskou; Pod sedadlom; Univerzálne/nezávislé od strany; Iné
pt-PT: Localização de montagem: Centro; Consola; No painel de instrumentos; Bombordo; Estibordo; Montagem em superfície (universal); Bagageira/área de carga; Por baixo do painel de instrumentos; Por baixo do banco; Universal/não específico de um lado; Outro
tr: Montaj yeri: Orta; Konsol; Gösterge paneli içi; İskele; Sancak; Yüzey montajı (evrensel); Bagaj / kargo alanı; Gösterge paneli altı; Koltuk altı; Evrensel/Yöne özgü olmayan; Diğer
ru: Место крепления: По центру; Консоль; В панели приборов; По левому борту; По правому борту; Накладной монтаж (универсальный); Багажник / грузовой отсек; Под панелью приборов; Под сиденьем; Универсальный / без привязки к стороне; Другое
cs: Místo montáže: Střed; Konzole; Do palubní desky; Levobok; Pravobok; Povrchová montáž (univerzální); Kufr / zavazadlový prostor; Pod palubní desku; Pod sedadlo; Univerzální / bez určení strany; Jiné
bg-BG: Място за монтаж: В центъра; Конзола; В таблото; Ляв борд; Десен борд; Повърхностен монтаж (универсален); Багажник / товарна зона; Под таблото; Под седалката; Универсално/без специфична страна; Друго
ja: 取付位置: センター; コンソール; インダッシュ; 左舷 (ポート); 右舷 (スターボード); サーフェスマウント (ユニバーサル); トランク / カーゴエリア; アンダーダッシュ; アンダーシート; ユニバーサル/左右の指定なし; その他
el: Θέση τοποθέτησης: Κέντρο; Κονσόλα; Ενσωματωμένο στο ταμπλό; Αριστερή πλευρά (Port); Δεξιά πλευρά (Starboard); Επιφανειακή τοποθέτηση (γενικής χρήσης); Πορτμπαγκάζ / χώρος αποσκευών; Κάτω από το ταμπλό; Κάτω από το κάθισμα; Γενικής χρήσης/Όχι για συγκεκριμένη πλευρά; Άλλο
sv: Monteringsplats: Mitten; Konsol; I instrumentbrädan; Babord; Styrbord; Ytmonterad (universell); Bagageutrymme/lastutrymme; Under instrumentbrädan; Under sätet; Universell/inte sidospecifik; Övrigt
nl: Montagelocatie: Midden; Console; In het dashboard; Bakboord; Stuurboord; Opbouwmontage (universeel); Kofferbak / laadruimte; Onder het dashboard; Onder de stoel; Universeel/niet zijdespecifiek; Overig
zh-TW: 安裝位置: 中央; 中控台; 儀表板內; 左舷; 右舷; 表面安裝 (通用); 後車廂 / 載貨區; 儀表板下方; 座椅下方; 通用/無特定側邊; 其他
it: Posizione di montaggio: Centro; Console; Nel cruscotto; Babordo; Tribordo; Montaggio in superficie (universale); Bagagliaio / vano di carico; Sotto il cruscotto; Sotto il sedile; Universale/Non specifico per un lato; Altro
da: Monteringssted: Midt; Konsol; Indbygget i instrumentbræt; Bagbord; Styrbord; Overflademontering (universel); Bagagerum / lastområde; Under instrumentbræt; Under sæde; Universel / ikke sidespecifik; Andet
pt-BR: Local de montagem: Centro; Console; No painel; Bombordo; Estibordo; Montagem em superfície (universal); Porta-malas / área de carga; Sob o painel; Sob o assento; Universal/sem lado específico; Outros
hu: Rögzítési hely: Közép; Konzol; Műszerfalba építhető; Bal oldal (port); Jobb oldal (starboard); Felületre szerelhető (univerzális); Csomagtartó / raktér; Műszerfal alá rögzíthető; Ülés alá rögzíthető; Univerzális/Nem oldalspecifikus; Egyéb
es: Ubicación de montaje: Centro; Consola; En el tablero; Babor; Estribor; Montaje en superficie (universal); Maletero / área de carga; Debajo del tablero; Debajo del asiento; Universal/sin lado específico; Otro
zh-CN: 安装位置: 居中; 控制台; 仪表盘内; 左舷; 右舷; 表面安装（通用）; 后备箱/载货区; 仪表盘下; 座椅下; 通用/非特定侧; 其他
ko: 장착 위치: 중앙; 콘솔; 대시보드 내부(인대시); 좌현(Port); 우현(Starboard); 표면 장착형(범용); 트렁크/화물칸; 대시보드 하단(언더대시); 시트 하단; 범용/방향 구별 없음; 기타
ro-RO: Locații de montare: Central; Consolă; Încorporat în bord; Babort; Tribord; Montare pe suprafață (universală); Portbagaj / spațiu de marfă; Sub bord; Sub scaun; Universal/Fără specificare a părții; Altele
pl: Montaż lokalizacji: Środek; Konsola; W desce rozdzielczej; Lewa burta; Prawa burta; Montaż nawierzchniowy (uniwersalny); Bagażnik / przestrzeń ładunkowa; Pod deską rozdzielczą; Pod siedzeniem; Uniwersalne / bez określonej strony; Inne
fr: Emplacement de fixation: Centre; Console; Sur tableau de bord; Bâbord; Tribord; Montage en surface (universel); Coffre / espace de chargement; Sous tableau de bord; Sous le siège; Universel / sans côté spécifique; Autre
hr-HR: Mjesto montaže: Sredina; Konzola; U instrumentnoj ploči; Lijevi bok; Desni bok; Nadgradna montaža (univerzalna); Prtljažnik / teretni prostor; Ispod instrumentne ploče; Ispod sjedala; Univerzalno / nije specifično za stranu; Ostalo
th: ตำแหน่งการติดตั้ง: ตรงกลาง; คอนโซล; ในคอนโซลหน้า; กราบซ้าย; กราบขวา; ยึดพื้นผิว (อเนกประสงค์); ท้ายรถ/พื้นที่เก็บสัมภาระ; ใต้คอนโซลหน้า; ใต้เบาะ; อเนกประสงค์/ไม่เจาะจงด้าน; อื่นๆ
lt-LT: Montavimo vieta: Centras; Konsolė; Prietaisų skydelyje; Kairysis bortas (angl. port); Dešinysis bortas (angl. starboard); Paviršinis laikiklis (universalus); Bagažinė / krovinių skyrius; Po prietaisų skydeliu; Po sėdyne; Universalus / nepriklauso nuo pusės; Kita